Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 4
Payday Loans

§ 28-46-401. Definitions.

As used in this act, unless the context otherwise requires, “payday loan” means a transaction pursuant to a written agreement between a creditor and the maker of a check whereby the creditor:

Accepts a check from the maker;

Agrees to hold the check for a period of time prior to negotiation, deposit or presentment; and

Pays to the maker of the check the amount of the check, less the fee permitted by this chapter.

Payday loans are regulated consumer credit transactions, and all provisions of the Idaho credit code relating to regulated loans apply to payday loans and to persons engaged in the business of payday loans except for part 3, chapter 46, title 28, Idaho Code.

As used in this part, “check” refers to a check or the electronic equivalent of a check, including an authorization given by a borrower to a creditor to withdraw an agreed upon amount from any account held by the borrower.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “licensee” means a person licensed under this part and all persons required to be licensed under this part.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-401, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490; am. 2014, ch. 270, § 1, p. 674.

§ 28-46-402. License required.

No person shall engage in the business of payday loans, offer or make a payday loan, or arrange a payday loan for a third party lender in a payday loan transaction without having first obtained a license under this chapter. A separate license shall be required for each location from which such business is conducted.

Any “supervised financial organization,” as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code, or any person organized, chartered, or holding an authorization certificate under the laws of another state to engage in making loans and receiving deposits, including a savings, share, certificate, or deposit account and who is subject to supervision by an official or agency of the other state, shall be exempt from the licensing requirements of this section.

A payday loan made in this state in violation of the licensing requirement of this section is void, uncollectible and unenforceable. For any such payday loan the debtor is not obligated to pay the principal or any fee associated with such payday loan. If a debtor has paid any part of the principal or fee, the debtor has a right to recover the payment from the person violating the provisions of this section or from an assignee of that person’s rights who undertakes direct collection of payments or enforcement of rights arising from the debt. In the event the administrator initiates an administrative or civil action against a person who has violated the provisions of this section, the administrator shall be entitled to recover the principal and fees received by such person in a payday loan transaction made in violation of the provisions of this section.

If the administrator finds that a person subject to this part has violated, is violating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that a person is about to violate the provisions of this part, or any rule promulgated under this act and pertinent to this part, the administrator may, in his discretion, order the person to cease and desist from the violations.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-402, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490; am. 2006, ch. 122, § 12, p. 340; am. 2009, ch. 175, § 1, p. 555; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 14, p. 108.

§ 28-46-403. Qualifications for payday loan license.

To qualify for a license, an applicant shall satisfy the following requirements:

The applicant shall have liquid assets of at least thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, provided that applicants seeking to engage in the business of payday loans at more than one (1) location in the state shall have liquid assets of at least an additional five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each additional location in the state up to a maximum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for all locations in the state; and

The financial responsibility, financial condition, business experience, character and general fitness of the applicant shall reasonably warrant the administrator’s belief that the applicant’s business will be conducted lawfully and fairly. In determining whether this qualification has been met, and for the purpose of investigating compliance with this act, the administrator may review:

The relevant business records and the capital adequacy of the applicant;

The competence, experience, integrity and financial ability of any applicant, and if the applicant is an entity, of any person who is a member, partner, director, senior officer or twenty-five percent (25%) or more equity owner of the applicant; and

Any record of conviction, on the part of the applicant, or any person referred to in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, of any criminal activity; any fraud or other act of personal dishonesty; any act, omission or practice which constitutes a breach of a fiduciary duty; or any suspension, revocation, removal or administrative action by any agency or department of the United States or any state, from participation in the conduct of any business.

The requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section are continuing in nature. A licensee shall meet the requirements of this section at all times while licensed pursuant to this part 4.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-403, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490; am. 2006, ch. 122, § 13, p. 340.

§ 28-46-404. Application for payday loan license.

Each application for a license shall be in writing and under oath to the administrator, in a form prescribed by the administrator, and shall include at least the following:

The legal name, residence and business address of the applicant and, if the applicant is an entity, of every member, partner, director, senior officer or twenty-five percent (25%) or more equity owner of the applicant;

The location at which the principal place of business of the applicant is located; and

Other data and information the administrator may require with respect to the applicant, and if the applicant is an entity, such data and information of its members, partners, directors, senior officers, or twenty-five percent (25%) or more equity owners of the applicant.

Each application for a license shall be accompanied by an application fee in the amount of three hundred fifty dollars ($350). Such fee shall not be subject to refund.

The fee set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall be required for each location for which an application is submitted.

Within sixty (60) days of the filing of an application in a form prescribed by the administrator, accompanied by the fee required in subsection (2) of this section, the administrator shall investigate to ascertain whether the qualifications prescribed by subsection (1) of section 28-46-403, Idaho Code, have been satisfied. If the administrator finds that the qualifications have been satisfied and approves the documents, the administrator shall issue to the applicant a license to engage in the payday loan business.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 67-5254, Idaho Code, a license issued pursuant to this part automatically expires if not timely renewed according to the requirements of subsection (7) of this section, or the license is relinquished, suspended or revoked pursuant to this act. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 67-5254, Idaho Code, branch licenses issued under this part also expire upon the expiration, relinquishment or revocation of a license issued under this part to a licensee’s designated home office.

A license application shall be deemed withdrawn and void if an applicant submits an incomplete license application and, after receipt of a written notice of the application deficiency, fails to provide the director with information necessary to complete the application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the deficiency notice. A written deficiency notice shall be deemed received by a license applicant when:

Placed in regular U.S. mail by the director or his agent using an address provided by the applicant on the license application; or

E-mailed to the applicant using an e-mail address provided by the applicant on the license application; or

Posted by the director or his agent on the NMLSR if the license application was submitted through the NMLSR.

On or before May 31 of each year, every licensee under this part 4 shall pay a nonrefundable annual license renewal fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per licensed location, and shall file with the administrator a renewal form containing such information as the administrator may require.

For a period of time not to exceed sixty (60) days following license expiration, the director may reinstate an expired license if he finds that the applicant meets the requirements for licensure under this part and the applicant has submitted to the director:
(a) A complete application for renewal;

(b) The fees required to apply for license renewal unless previously paid for the period for which the license renewal applies; and

(c) A reinstatement fee of two hundred dollars ($200).

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-404, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490; am. 2006, ch. 122, § 14, p. 340; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 5, p. 108.

§ 28-46-405. Denial of license.

If the administrator determines that an applicant is not qualified to receive a license, the administrator shall notify the applicant in writing that the application has been denied, and shall state the basis for denial.

If the administrator denies an application, or if the administrator fails to act on an application within sixty (60) days after the filing of a properly completed application, the applicant may make written demand to the administrator for a hearing on the question of whether the license should be granted. Written demand for a hearing may not be made more than fifteen (15) days after the administrator has mailed a writing to the applicant notifying him that the application has been denied and stating the basis for denial. In the event of a hearing, the administrator shall reconsider the application and, after the hearing, issue a written order granting or denying the application.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-405, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490.

§ 28-46-406. Nontransferability — Change in control.

Other than the transfer of a license to a new location as set forth in subsection (3) of this section, a license issued pursuant to this chapter is not transferable or assignable.

The prior written approval of the administrator is required for the continued operation of a payday loan business whenever a change in control of a licensee is proposed. Control in the case of an entity means direct or indirect ownership, or the right to vote or otherwise control, twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the governance interests of the entity, or the ability of any person to elect a majority of the directors. The administrator may require information deemed necessary to determine whether a new application is required. Costs incurred by the administrator in investigating a change of control request shall be paid by the licensee requesting such approval.

A licensee shall notify the administrator in writing at least fifteen (15) days before any proposed changes in the licensee’s business location or name.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-406, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490.

§ 28-46-407. Suspension or revocation of license.

The administrator may, after notice and hearing, suspend or revoke any license if the administrator finds that the licensee:

Has knowingly or through the lack of due care failed to pay any fee imposed by the administrator under the authority of this act;

Has committed any fraud, engaged in any dishonest activities or made any misrepresentations;

Has violated any provision of this act or any rule or order lawfully made pursuant to this act or has violated any other law in the course of the licensee’s dealing as a licensee;

Has made a materially false statement in the application for the license or failed to give a true reply to a question in the application; or

Has demonstrated incompetence or untrustworthiness to act as a licensee.

If the reason for revocation or suspension of a licensee’s license at any one (1) location is of general application to all locations operated by a licensee, the administrator may revoke or suspend all licenses issued to a licensee.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-407, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490; am. 2006, ch. 122, § 15, p. 340.

§ 28-46-408. Reports to administrator.

Within fifteen (15) days of the occurrence of any of the events listed below, a licensee shall file a written report with the administrator describing such events and their expected impact on the activities of the licensee in the state:

The filing for bankruptcy or reorganization by the licensee;

The institution of revocation or suspension proceedings against the licensee by any state or governmental authority;

Any felony indictment of the licensee and, if the licensee is an entity, of any of its members, partners, directors, senior officers or twenty-five percent (25%) or more equity owners;

Any felony conviction of the licensee and, if the licensee is an entity, of any of its members, partners, directors, senior officers or twenty-five percent (25%) or more equity owners; and

Such other events as the administrator may determine and identify by rule.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-408, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490.

§ 28-46-409. Records — Annual reports.

Every licensee shall maintain records in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and practices in a manner that will enable the administrator to determine whether the licensee is complying with the provisions of this act. The recordkeeping system of a licensee shall be sufficient if he makes the required information reasonably available. The records need not be kept in the place of business where payday loans are made if the administrator is given free access to the records wherever located. The records pertaining to any loan need not be preserved for more than two (2) years after the due date of the loan.

On or before May 31 of each year, every licensee shall file with the administrator a composite annual report for the prior calendar year in the form prescribed by the administrator relating to all payday loans made by him. Information contained in annual reports shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, and may be published only in composite form.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-409, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490; am. 2015, ch. 141, § 50, p. 379.

§ 28-46-410. Examinations and investigations.

The administrator shall examine periodically, at intervals he deems appropriate, the loans and business records of every payday lender. In addition, for the purpose of discovering violations of this act or securing information lawfully required, the administrator may at any time investigate the loans, business and records of any payday lender. For these purposes, the administrator shall have free and reasonable access to the offices, places of business, and records of the lender. The administrator, for purposes of examination of licensees herein, shall be paid the cost of examination by the licensee within thirty (30) days of demand for payment. The administrator shall, on July 1 of each year, fix such per diem examination cost.

If the lender’s records are located outside this state, the lender, at his option, shall make them available to the administrator at a convenient location within this state or pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the administrator or his representative to examine them at the place where they are maintained. The administrator may designate representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are located, to inspect them on his behalf.

For the purposes of this section, the administrator may administer oaths or affirmations and, upon his own motion or upon request of any party, may subpoena witnesses, compel the attendance of witnesses, adduce evidence and require the production of any matter which is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition and location of any books, documents or other tangible items and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts, or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence.

Upon failure without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena or to give testimony, and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected thereby, the administrator may apply to the district court for an order compelling compliance.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-410, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490.

§ 28-46-411. Application of administrative procedure act.

Except as otherwise provided, the Idaho administrative procedure act, as set forth in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, applies to and governs all administrative action taken by the administrator pursuant to this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-411, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490.

§ 28-46-412. Payday loan procedures.

Each payday loan must be documented in a written agreement signed by the borrower. The loan agreement must include the name of the licensee, the loan date, the principal amount of the loan, and a statement of the total amount of fees charged as a condition of making the loan, expressed both as a dollar amount and as an annual percentage rate (APR).

The maximum principal amount of any payday loan is one thousand dollars ($1000).

A licensee may charge a fee for each payday loan. Such fee shall be deemed fully earned as of the date of the transaction and shall not be deemed interest for any purpose of law. No other fee or charges may be charged or collected for the payday loan except as specifically set forth in this act.

Each licensee shall conspicuously post in each licensed location a notice of the fees, expressed as a dollar amount per one hundred dollars ($100), charged for payday loans.

A payday loan may be made pursuant to a transaction whereby the licensee:
(5)(a) A payday loan may be made pursuant to a transaction whereby the licensee:

Accepts a check from a borrower who is the maker of the check; and

Agrees not to negotiate, deposit or present the check for an agreed upon period of time and pays to the maker the amount of the check, less the fees permitted by this act.

In such a transaction, the licensee may accept only one (1) postdated check for each loan as security for the loan. Before the licensee may negotiate or present a check for payment, the check shall be endorsed with the actual name under which the licensee is doing business. The borrower shall have the right to redeem the check from the licensee at any time prior to the presentment or deposit of the check by making payment to the licensee of the full amount of the check in cash or immediately available funds.

The amount advanced to the borrower by the licensee in a payday loan may be paid to the borrower in the form of cash, the licensee’s business check, a money order, an electronic funds transfer to the borrower’s account, or other reasonable electronic payment mechanism, provided however, that no additional fee may be charged to the borrower by a licensee to access the proceeds of the payday loan.

A payday loan may be repaid by the borrower in cash, by negotiation of the borrower’s check in a transaction pursuant to subsection (5) of this section or, with the agreement of the licensee, a debit card, a cashier’s check, an electronic funds transfer from the borrower’s bank account, or any other reasonable electronic payment mechanism to which the parties may agree.

A payday lender shall not make more than two (2) electronic representments of a borrower’s check to a depository institution.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-412, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490; am. 2014, ch. 270, § 2, p. 674.

§ 28-46-413. Payday loan business practices.

No licensee or person related to a licensee by common control may have outstanding at any time to a single borrower a loan or loans with an aggregate principal balance exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), plus allowable fees.

A payday lender shall not make a payday loan that exceeds twenty-five percent (25%) of the gross monthly income of the borrower when the loan is made.

A payday lender shall obtain income information from a borrower consistent with subsection (4) of this section not less than once every twelve (12) months.

A payday lender shall not be in violation of subsection (2) of this section if the borrower presents evidence of his gross monthly income to the payday lender or represents to the payday lender in writing that the payday loan does not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the borrower’s gross monthly income when the loan is made.

No payday loan shall be repaid by the proceeds of another payday loan made by the same licensee or a person related to the licensee by common control.

If the borrower’s check is returned unpaid to the licensee from a payor financial institution, the licensee shall have the right to collect charges authorized by section 28-22-105, Idaho Code, provided such charges are disclosed in the loan agreement. A licensee may not charge treble damages. If the borrower’s obligation is assigned to any third party for collection, the provisions of this section shall apply to such third party collector.

A licensee, or person required to be licensed pursuant to this part, shall not threaten a borrower with criminal action as a result of any payment deficit.

No licensee, or person required to be licensed pursuant to this part, shall engage in unfair or deceptive acts, practices or advertising in the conduct of a payday loan business.

A licensee may renew a payday loan no more than three (3) consecutive times, after which the payday loan shall be repaid in full by the borrower. A borrower may enter into a new loan transaction with the licensee at any time after a prior loan to the borrower is completed. A loan secured by a borrower’s check is completed when the check is presented or deposited by the licensee or redeemed by the borrower pursuant to section 28-46-412(5), Idaho Code.

Other than a borrower’s check in a transaction pursuant to section 28-46-412(5), Idaho Code, a licensee shall not accept any property, title to property, or other evidence of ownership as collateral for a payday loan.

A licensee may conduct other business at a location where it engages in payday lending unless it carries on such other business for the purpose of evading or violating the provisions of this act.

A borrower may rescind the payday loan at no cost at any time prior to the close of business on the next business day following the day on which the payday loan was made by paying the principal amount of the loan to the licensee in cash or other immediately available funds.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-413, as added by 2003, ch. 182, § 1, p. 490; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 6, p. 108; am. 2014, ch. 270, § 3, p. 674.

§ 28-46-414. Extended payment plans.

A payday lender shall allow the borrower, upon request, to enter into an extended payment plan that meets the requirements of this section once during any consecutive twelve (12) month period, subject to the following provisions:

A payday lender is not required to enter into an extended payment plan with a borrower more than one (1) time during any consecutive twelve (12) month period.

An extended payment plan shall be in writing and must be executed not later than the day the payday loan is due. The plan shall provide a payment schedule that allows at least four (4) equal payments over a time period of not less than sixty (60) days and shall include the disclosures required under section 28-46-415, Idaho Code.

A borrower’s obligations under an extended payment plan shall be not greater than the amount owed under the terms of the original payday loan.

A payday lender shall not charge interest or additional fees as part of an extended payment plan, except as permitted in section 28-46-413(6), Idaho Code. If a borrower defaults under the extended payment plan, the payday lender may terminate the extended payment plan and accelerate the requirement to pay the amount owed.

A payday lender shall not initiate collection activities against a borrower for a payday loan that is subject to an extended payment plan so long as the borrower is in compliance with the terms of the extended payment plan.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-414, as added by 2014, ch. 270, § 4, p. 674.

§ 28-46-415. Disclosures.

Before disbursing funds pursuant to a payday loan, a payday lender shall provide written notice in not less than twelve (12) point bold type and in all capitalized letters to the borrower stating the following:

“1. Payday loans are intended to address short-term, not long-term, financial needs.

2. You will be required to pay additional fees if the payday loan is renewed rather than paid in full when due.

3. You have the right to rescind the payday loan at no cost no later than the end of the next business day following the day on which the payday loan is made.

4. Payday loans may contain high-cost features, and borrowers should consider alternative lower-cost loans.

5. If you believe that the lender has violated the law, you may file a written complaint with the Idaho Department of Finance. Filing a complaint does not limit nor impair any rights you may have against the lender.

6. You have a one-time right during any consecutive twelve (12) month period to convert a payday loan into an extended payment plan.”

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-415, as added by 2014, ch. 270, § 5, p. 674.